Utah statutes.
13-5b-102.   Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter:
(1)  "Affiliate" means an organization that directly or indirectly through one
or more intermediaries controls, is controlled by, or is under common control
with another organization.
(2)  "Integrated health system" means an organization that directly, or
through an affiliate or subsidiary:
(a)  owns and operates one or more hospitals in the state; and
(b)  offers health insurance to residents of the state.
(3)  "Subsidiary" means an affiliate controlled:
(a)  by a specified person;
(b)  directly or indirectly; and
(c)  through one or more intermediaries.
